Maryland, session 2026, HB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–401.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(e) (1) “Public school employee” means a certificated professional individual
who is employed by a public school employer or an individual of equivalent status in
Baltimore City, except for a county superintendent or an individual designated by the
public school employer to act in a negotiating capacity as provided in § 6–406(c) of this
subtitle.
(2) In Montgomery County, “public school employees” include:
(i) Certificated and noncertificated substitute teachers employed by
the public school employer for at least 7 days before March 1 of the school fiscal year ending
June 30, 1978, and each year after; and
(ii) Home and hospital teachers employed by the public school
employer for at least 7 days before March 1 of the school fiscal year ending June 30, 2000,
and each year after.
(3) In Baltimore County, “public school employee” includes a secondary
school nurse, an elementary school nurse, and a special school nurse.

HOUSE BILL 1492 3
(4) In Frederick County, “public school employee” includes a social worker
employed by a public school employer.
(5) In Prince George’s County, “public school employee” includes home and
hospital teachers and Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) instructors.
(6) In Baltimore County, Calvert County, Charles County, and Garrett
County, “public school employee” includes Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC)
instructors.
(7) In Carroll County, “public school employee” includes:
(i) A registered nurse;
(ii) Supervisory noncertificated employees as defined under §
6–501(i) of this title; and
(iii) Junior Reserve Officer Training Corps (JROTC) instructors.
(8) In Dorchester County, “public school employee” includes supervisory
noncertificated employees as defined under § 6–501(i) of this title.
6–401.1.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH, DIMINISH, OR
LIMIT THE RIGHT TO STRIKE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–408 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
6–406.
(e) (1) If, on the request of either party, the Board determines from the facts
that an impasse is reached in negotiations between a public school employer and an
employee organization that is designated as an exclusive negotiating agent, the Board shall
within 10 calendar days:
(i) Request last and best offers from the public school employer and
the employee organization, which may not include items or topics not previously raised in
the bargaining process; and
(ii) Order the public school employer and the employee organization
to commence mediation within 14 days after the Board’s determination that an impasse
has been reached.
(2) The last and best offers shall list separately every term or condition of
employment in dispute and the demand of the party making the last and best offer.
(3) Within 5 calendar days after an order to mediate, the parties shall
select a mediator by:

HOUSE BILL 1492
(i) Agreement; or
(ii) Alternate striking from a list of seven neutral parties furnished
by:
1. The Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service; or
2. The American Arbitration Association.
(4) The mediator shall conclude the mediation within 25 days after
convening the first mediation session.
(5) If the public school employer and the employee organization do not
reach agreement before concluding the mediation, the mediator shall issue a written offer
to both parties and the Board of settlement of all matters raised.
(6) Within 5 days after receiving the proposed settlement, the public school
employer and the employee organization each shall notify the mediator of its intent to:
(i) Accept the written proposed settlement;
(ii) Accept the written proposed settlement in part, as mutually
agreed on by the public school employer and the employee organization; or
(iii) Decline the proposed settlement and request arbitration before
the Board.
(7) The public school employer and the employee organization shall share
the costs of the mediator equally.
(8) If either party declines the proposed settlement and requests
arbitration, the Board shall, within 5 calendar days, set a date for an arbitration hearing
before the Board.
(9) The Board shall:
(i) Open the arbitration record within 20 days after receiving either
party’s decision to decline the mediator’s proposal;
(ii) Convene a hearing;
(iii) Hear testimony from and receive supporting written evidence, as
provided in an order of the Board, from the public school employer, the employee
organization, and the mediator;
(iv) Administer oaths to witnesses deemed relevant and called by the

HOUSE BILL 1492 5
Board;
(v) Issue subpoenas to compel the production of relevant and
nonprivileged documents and other tangible evidence that would also be subject to
production before a hearing or at a hearing under Title 4 of the General Provisions Article;
and
(vi) Receive, hear, and consider all evidence considered relevant by
the Board, whether or not offered through an attorney, including:
1. The wages, hours, working conditions, or other terms and
conditions of employment of similar public employees in comparable surrounding
jurisdictions and comparable jurisdictions outside the State; and
2. The ability of the public school employer and the county
served by the public school employer to pay, considering their existing resources, the costs
of the final offers proposed and other personnel costs.
(10) The Board shall conclude the hearing by issuing a written order within
20 days after the arbitration record is opened.
(11) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (12) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Board shall issue the written award that selects and adopts:
(i) The complete final offer of the public school employer;
(ii) The complete final offer of the employee organization; or
(iii) The mediator’s complete offer of settlement.
(12) EXCEPT BY AGREEMENT OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION, THE
BOARD’S WRITTEN AWARD MAY NOT ABRIDGE THE RIGHTS OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE
UNDER § 6–408 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(13) The Board’s written award is final and binding on the public school
employer and the employee organization.
[(13)] (14) The public school employer and the employee organization shall
share the costs of the hearing equally.
[(14)] (15) Any negotiated provision or decision of the Board is subject to the
other provisions of this article concerning the fiscal relationship between the public school
employer and the county commissioners, county council, and Mayor and City Council of
Baltimore City.
6–408.

HOUSE BILL 1492
(A) PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYER ORGANIZATIONS SHALL
HAVE THE RIGHT TO ENGAGE IN A STRIKE.
(B) A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYER MAY NOT PROMISE, THREATEN, OR TAKE
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS AGAINST A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE:
(1) PERMANENTLY REPLACE THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE FOR
SUPPORTING OR PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE;
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE WHO IS
WORKING, HAS RETURNED TO WORK, OR HAS OFFERED UNCONDITIONALLY TO
RETURN TO WORK FOR THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYER AFTER SUPPORTING OR
PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE; OR
(3) LOCK OUT, SUSPEND, OR OTHERWISE WITHHOLD EMPLOYMENT
FROM PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES IN ORDER TO INFLUENCE THE POSITION OF THE
PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES OR AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION PRECEDING A
STRIKE.
6–501.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g) (1) “Public school employee” means a noncertificated individual who is
employed for at least 9 months a year on a full–time basis by a public school employer.
(2) “Public school employee” includes a noncertificated employee in
Baltimore City notwithstanding that the noncertificated employee does not work for at
least 9 months a year on a full–time basis.
(3) “Public school employee” does not include:
(i) A managerial employee; or
(ii) A confidential employee.
6–502.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH, DIMINISH, OR
LIMIT THE RIGHT TO STRIKE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–508 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
6–507.
(e) (1) If, on the request of either party, the Board determines from the facts

HOUSE BILL 1492 7
that an impasse is reached in negotiations between a public school employer and an
employee organization that is designated as an exclusive negotiating agent, the Board shall
within 10 calendar days:
(i) Request last and best offers from the public school employer and
the employee organization, which may not include items or topics not previously raised in
the bargaining process; and
(ii) Order the public school employer and the employee organization
to commence mediation within 14 days after the Board’s determination that an impasse
has been reached.
(2) The last and best offers shall list separately every term or condition of
employment in dispute and the demand of the party making the last and best offer.
(3) Within 5 calendar days after an order to mediate, the parties shall
select a mediator by:
(i) Agreement; or
(ii) Alternate striking from a list of seven neutral parties furnished
by:
1. The Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service; or
2. The American Arbitration Association.
(4) The mediator shall conclude the mediation within 25 days after
convening the first mediation session.
(5) If the public school employer and the employee organization do not
reach agreement before concluding the mediation, the mediator shall issue a written offer
to both parties and the Board of settlement of all matters raised.
(6) Within 5 days after receiving the proposed settlement, the public school
employer and the employee organization each shall notify the mediator of its intent to:
(i) Accept the written proposed settlement;
(ii) Accept the written proposed settlement in part, as mutually
agreed on by the public school employer and the employee organization; or
(iii) Decline the proposed settlement and request arbitration before
the Board.
(7) The public school employer and the employee organization shall share
the costs of the mediator equally.

HOUSE BILL 1492
(8) If either party declines the proposed settlement and requests
arbitration, the Board shall, within 5 calendar days, set a date for an arbitration hearing
before the Board.
(9) The Board shall:
(i) Open the arbitration record within 20 days after receiving either
party’s decision to decline the mediator’s proposal;
(ii) Convene a hearing;
(iii) Hear testimony from and receive supporting written evidence, as
provided in an order of the Board, from the public school employer, the employee
organization, and the mediator;
(iv) Administer oaths to witnesses deemed relevant and called by the
Board;
(v) Issue subpoenas to compel the production of relevant and
nonprivileged documents and other tangible evidence that would also be subject to
production before a hearing or at a hearing under Title 4 of the General Provisions Article;
and
(vi) Receive, hear, and consider all evidence considered relevant by
the Board, whether or not offered through an attorney, including:
1. The wages, hours, working conditions, or other terms and
conditions of employment of similar public employees in comparable surrounding
jurisdictions and comparable jurisdictions outside the State; and
2. The ability of the public school employer and the county
served by the public school employer to pay, considering their existing resources, the costs
of the final offers proposed and other personnel costs.
(10) The Board shall conclude the hearing by issuing a written order within
20 days after the arbitration record is opened.
(11) [The] SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (12) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE
Board shall issue the written award that selects and adopts:
(i) The complete final offer of the public school employer;
(ii) The complete final offer of the employee organization; or
(iii) The mediator’s complete offer of settlement.

HOUSE BILL 1492 9
(12) EXCEPT BY AGREEMENT OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION, THE
BOARD’S WRITTEN AWARD MAY NOT ABRIDGE THE RIGHTS OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE
UNDER § 6–508 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(13) The Board’s written award is final and binding on the public school
employer and the employee organization.
[(13)] (14) The public school employer and the employee organization shall
share the costs of the hearing equally.
[(14)] (15) Any negotiated provision or decision of the Board is subject to the
other provisions of this article concerning the fiscal relationship between the public school
employer and the county commissioners and county council.
6–508.
(A) PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYER ORGANIZATIONS SHALL
HAVE THE RIGHT TO ENGAGE IN A STRIKE.
(B) A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYER MAY NOT PROMISE, THREATEN, OR TAKE
THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS AGAINST A PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE:
(1) PERMANENTLY REPLACE THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE FOR
SUPPORTING OR PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE;
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEE WHO IS
WORKING, HAS RETURNED TO WORK, OR HAS OFFERED UNCONDITIONALLY TO
RETURN TO WORK FOR THE PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYER AFTER SUPPORTING OR
PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE; OR
(3) LOCK OUT, SUSPEND, OR OTHERWISE WITHHOLD EMPLOYMENT
FROM PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES IN ORDER TO INFLUENCE THE POSITION OF THE
PUBLIC SCHOOL EMPLOYEES OR AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION PRECEDING A
STRIKE.
23–801.1.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH, DIMINISH, OR
LIMIT THE RIGHT TO STRIKE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 23–812 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
23–807.
(a) If an employee organization is certified as described in this subtitle, the
employer and the employee organization shall enter into a collective bargaining agreement

HOUSE BILL 1492
that contains provisions regarding:
(1) Wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment;
(2) The orderly processing and settlement of grievances regarding the
interpretation and implementation of the collective bargaining agreement; and
(3) Other topics that the parties may mutually agree to that were suitable
for bargaining.
(b) (1) The employer automatically shall deduct from the paycheck of an
employee, who is a member of the bargaining unit represented by the certified exclusive
representative, dues authorized and owed by the employee to the certified exclusive
representative if the employee submits to the employer a dues deduction authorization card
that has been duly executed by the employee.
(2) Any dues deducted from paychecks under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be remitted to the certified exclusive representative.
(3) The employer automatically shall stop making payroll deductions
under paragraph (1) of this subsection on behalf of a certified exclusive representative if:
(i) The certified exclusive representative is decertified;
(ii) The certified exclusive representative’s right to dues is revoked;
(iii) The employee ceases to be a member of the bargaining unit
represented by the certified exclusive representative; or
(iv) The employee resigns from membership in the employee
organization.
(c) This section may not be construed to[:
(1) Authorize or otherwise allow an employee to engage in a strike as
defined in § 3–303 of the State Personnel and Pensions Article; or
(2) Restrict] RESTRICT the authority of the County Executive or the
County Council to determine the budget of the employer.
(d) (1) A collective bargaining agreement entered into under subsection (a) of
this section shall be effective on ratification by the majority of votes cast by the employees
in the bargaining unit and approval by the Director and Board.
(2) A single year or multiyear collective bargaining agreement shall expire
at the close of Baltimore County’s fiscal year.

HOUSE BILL 1492 11
23–808.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the employer
and the certified exclusive representative shall reach an agreement by March 1 of the year
in which a collective bargaining agreement will expire.
(2) The employer and the certified exclusive representative mutually may
agree to extend negotiations for a period not to extend past June 30 of the year in which a
collective bargaining agreement will expire.
(b) An impasse is reached during the negotiations between the employer and the
certified exclusive representative if the employer and the certified exclusive representative
do not reach an agreement by:
(1) March 1 of the year in which a collective bargaining agreement will
expire; or
(2) If negotiations were extended, the date to which negotiations were
extended under subsection (a)(2) of this section.
(c) (1) If an impasse is reached under subsection (b) of this section, the
employer and the certified exclusive representative shall submit a final offer to the other
party within 48 hours after the impasse is reached.
(2) Unless the impasse reached under subsection (b) of this section has
been resolved, the dispute and the final offers shall be submitted to the mediator selected
by the parties in accordance with subsection (d) of this section.
(d) (1) Within 30 days after a mediator is selected by the parties, the mediator
shall:
(i) Meet with the Director and the certified exclusive representative;
and
(ii) Make written findings of fact and recommendations for the
resolution of the dispute in accordance with this subsection.
(2) (i) If the parties are unable to agree on a mediator, they shall
request a list of seven mediators from the Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service.
(ii) Within 3 working days after receiving the list under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the parties shall alternately remove one mediator from
the list until only one mediator remains, who the parties shall agree will serve as the
mediator under this subsection.
(3) The mediator shall act as an intermediary in bringing the parties
together and shall actively assist the parties in resolving the dispute by:

HOUSE BILL 1492
(i) Conducting proceedings in accordance with this subsection;
(ii) Reviewing the final positions of the parties;
(iii) Identifying the major issues in the dispute between the parties;
(iv) Reviewing the positions of the parties; and
(v) Recommending a resolution for the agreement of the parties.
(4) A resolution under this subsection:
(i) Shall address matters such as wages, hours, or terms and
conditions of employment;
(ii) May not include health care benefits; and
(iii) May not exceed 1 fiscal year, unless agreed to by the parties.
(5) Any resolution under this subsection regarding pension benefits shall
be construed as a recommendation to or consideration for the appropriate pension
administrator of the State or Baltimore County.
(6) (i) Before issuing a final decision, the mediator shall take into
consideration, among any other relevant factors:
1. The wages and pension benefits, not including health care
benefits, of the employees of the bargaining unit;
2. The wages and pension benefits of other similarly situated
employees performing similar services in libraries of comparable jurisdictions to Baltimore
County in the State, taking into consideration the cost of living index for the area in which
the comparable department is located;
3. Wages and pension benefits of similarly situated
Baltimore County employees;
4. The last published annual U.S. Department of Labor
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers for All Items in the Washington–Baltimore
area;
5. The special nature of the work performed by the
employees of the bargaining unit, including:
A. Physical requirements of employment;

HOUSE BILL 1492 13
B. Educational requirements;
C. Job training and job skills; and
D. Shift assignments and the demands placed on the
employees compared to the demands placed on other similarly situated library employees
in comparable jurisdictions to Baltimore County;
6. State and county mandated expenditures;
7. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, availability
of funds, including financial sources of revenue; and
8. The interest and welfare of the public.
(ii) In considering the availability of funds for wage increases, the
mediator shall consider the general fund revenues of Baltimore County and the Baltimore
County Spending Affordability Committee Report.
(7) A mediator may not:
(i) Recommend a wage increase without approval of the County
Executive and County Council;
(ii) Recommend a pension benefit increase without approval of the
appropriate pension administrator of the State or Baltimore County; or
(iii) Consider testimony regarding funds for capital improvements,
surplus contingency, or reserve funds.
(8) (i) The parties are strongly encouraged to reach an agreement on all
issues whenever possible.
(ii) If no agreement can be reached by the parties, the mediator shall
issue a report with the mediator’s decision, including written findings of fact.
(9) The mediator may adopt a package of final positions or rule on each
matter separately.
(10) Copies of the mediator’s written findings and recommendations shall be
submitted to the Director and the certified exclusive representative on or before the
immediately following April 2.
(11) Any costs associated with this subsection shall be shared equally by the
employer and the certified exclusive representative.
(12) This subsection may not be construed to interfere with any efforts the

HOUSE BILL 1492
parties may undertake to reach an agreement at any time.
(13) (i) The County Executive is not bound by any decision made under
this subsection and shall act in accordance with this section.
(ii) The County Council may accept or reject the recommendation of
approval by the County Executive.
(14) This subsection shall be the exclusive procedure for resolving disputes
between the parties, unless the parties, by mutual agreement, determine to use another
method of dispute resolution.
(e) (1) The Director shall submit the findings and recommendations of the
mediator to the Board in a timely manner consistent with the timing of paragraph (2) of
this subsection.
(2) The Board shall approve all recommendations and findings of the
mediator that do not relate to a financial issue or require an appropriation of additional
funds within 5 days of the mediator’s decision.
(F) EXCEPT BY AGREEMENT OF THE EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION, THE
BOARD’S FINAL DECISION MAY NOT ABRIDGE THE RIGHTS OF A PUBLIC EMPLOYEE
UNDER § 23–812 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
23–812.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Lockout”], “LOCKOUT” means the temporary withholding of work, by
means of shutting down an operation or function in order to bring pressure on employees
or on their representatives to accept a change in compensation or rights, privileges,
obligations, or other terms and conditions of employment.
[(3) “Secondary boycott” means an activity by an employee organization or
its members that is intended to induce, encourage, or coerce persons doing business with
the employer to withhold, withdraw, or in any respect curtail their business relations with
the county.
(4) “Strike” means the refusal or failure by an employee or group of
employees to perform their duties of employment as assigned if a purpose of the refusal or
failure is to induce, force, or require the employer to act or refrain from acting with regard
to any matter.
(5) “Work stoppage” means:
(i) The willful absence of a group of employees from their positions;

HOUSE BILL 1492 15
(ii) The engaging in a slowdown by employees; or
(iii) The refusal of employees to perform job duties.]
[(b) In general, strikes, work stoppages, lockouts, and secondary boycotts are
prohibited.
(c) (1) Employees and employee organizations may not engage in, sponsor,
initiate, support, direct, or condone a strike, work stoppage, or secondary boycott.
(2) Employee organizations may not engage in, initiate, sponsor, or
support, directly or indirectly, picketing of the employer, its property, or field or office
facilities in furtherance of a strike, work stoppage, or secondary boycott.
(d) If an employee organization violates this section, the Board, after a majority
vote, may:
(1) Revoke the employee organization’s designation as certified exclusive
representative;
(2) Disqualify the employee organization from participating in
representation elections for a period of up to 2 years; and
(3) Terminate immediately the payroll deductions for the employee
organization’s dues.
(e) An employee who violates this section is subject to immediate disciplinary
action, which may include permanent dismissal from the employment by the employer for
just cause.]
(B) PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATIONS SHALL
HAVE THE RIGHT TO ENGAGE IN A STRIKE.
(C) A PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYER MAY NOT PROMISE, THREATEN, OR TAKE
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS AGAINST A PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEE:
(1) PERMANENTLY REPLACE THE PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEE FOR
SUPPORTING OR PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE;
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST THE PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEE WHO IS
WORKING, HAS RETURNED TO WORK, OR HAS OFFERED UNCONDITIONALLY TO
RETURN TO WORK FOR THE PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYER AFTER SUPPORTING OR
PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE; OR

HOUSE BILL 1492
(3) LOCK OUT, SUSPEND, OR OTHERWISE WITHHOLD EMPLOYMENT
FROM PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEES IN ORDER TO INFLUENCE THE POSITION OF THE
PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEES OR AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION PRECEDING A
STRIKE.
[(f)] (D) (1) The employer may not direct a lockout against employees.
(2) This subsection may not be construed to prohibit the employer from
exercising its managerial rights.
23–901.1.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH, DIMINISH, OR
LIMIT THE RIGHT TO STRIKE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 23–913 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
23–908.
(a) If an employee organization is certified as described in this subtitle, the
employer and the employee organization shall enter into a collective bargaining agreement
that contains provisions regarding:
(1) Wages, hours, and terms and conditions of employment;
(2) The orderly processing and settlement of grievances regarding the
interpretation and implementation of the collective bargaining agreement that culminate
in final and binding arbitration; and
(3) Other topics that the parties may mutually agree to that were suitable
for bargaining.
(b) (1) The employer automatically shall deduct from the paycheck of an
employee who is a member of the bargaining unit represented by the certified exclusive
representative dues authorized and owed by the employee to the certified exclusive
representative if the employee submits to the employer a dues deduction authorization that
has been duly executed by the employee.
(2) Any dues deducted from paychecks under paragraph (1) of this
subsection shall be remitted to the certified exclusive representative.
(3) The employer automatically shall stop making payroll deductions
under paragraph (1) of this subsection on behalf of a certified exclusive representative if:
(i) The certified exclusive representative is decertified;
(ii) The certified exclusive representative’s right to dues is revoked
under § 23–913(d)(3) of this subtitle;

HOUSE BILL 1492 17
(iii) The employee ceases to be a member of the bargaining unit
represented by the certified exclusive representative; or
(iv) Subject to paragraph (4) of this subsection, the employee revokes
the authorization for payments to the exclusive representative in accordance with the
procedures provided in a dues deduction authorization.
(4) The procedures provided in a dues deduction authorization utilized
under this subsection shall allow for a revocation of the authorization for payments to the
exclusive representative at least annually.
(c) This section may not be construed to[:
(1) Authorize or otherwise allow an employee to engage in a strike or work
stoppage, as those terms are defined in § 23–913 of this subtitle; or
(2) Restrict] RESTRICT the authority of the funding body of the applicable
county to determine the budget of the employer.
(d) (1) A collective bargaining agreement entered into under subsection (a) of
this section shall be effective on ratification by the majority of votes cast by the employees
in the bargaining unit and approval by the director and the employer.
(2) A single–year or multiyear collective bargaining agreement shall expire
at the close of the county’s fiscal year.
23–913.
(a) [(1)] In this section [the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Lockout”], “LOCKOUT” means the temporary withholding of work, by
means of shutting down an operation or function in order to bring pressure on employees
or on their representatives to accept a change in compensation or rights, privileges,
obligations, or other terms and conditions of employment.
[(3) “Secondary boycott” means an activity by an employee organization or
its members that is intended to induce, encourage, or coerce persons doing business with
the employer to withhold, withdraw, or in any respect curtail their business relations with
the county.
(4) “Strike” means the refusal or failure by an employee or group of
employees to perform their duties of employment as assigned if a purpose of the refusal or
failure is to induce, force, or require the employer to act or refrain from acting with regard
to any matter.
(5) “Work stoppage” means:

HOUSE BILL 1492
(i) The willful absence of a group of employees from their positions;
(ii) The engaging in a slowdown by employees; or
(iii) The refusal of employees to perform job duties.]
[(b) In general, strikes, work stoppages, lockouts, and secondary boycotts are
prohibited.
(c) (1) Employees and employee organizations may not engage in, sponsor,
initiate, support, direct, or condone a strike, work stoppage, or secondary boycott.
(2) Employee organizations may not engage in, initiate, sponsor, or
support, directly or indirectly, picketing of the employer, its property, or field or office
facilities in furtherance of a strike, work stoppage, or secondary boycott.
(d) If an employee organization violates this section, the employer may:
(1) Revoke the employee organization’s designation as certified exclusive
representative;
(2) Disqualify the employee organization from participating in
representation elections for a period of up to 2 years; and
(3) Terminate immediately the payroll deductions for the employee
organization’s dues.
(e) An employee who violates this section is subject to immediate disciplinary
action, which may include permanent dismissal from the employment by the employer for
just cause.]
(B) PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEES AND EMPLOYER ORGANIZATIONS SHALL
HAVE THE RIGHT TO ENGAGE IN A STRIKE.
(C) A PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYER MAY NOT PROMISE, THREATEN, OR TAKE
ANY OF THE FOLLOWING ACTIONS AGAINST A PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEE:
(1) PERMANENTLY REPLACE THE PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEE FOR
SUPPORTING OR PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE;
(2) DISCRIMINATE AGAINST THE PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEE WHO IS
WORKING, HAS RETURNED TO WORK, OR HAS OFFERED UNCONDITIONALLY TO
RETURN TO WORK FOR THE PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYER AFTER SUPPORTING OR
PARTICIPATING IN A STRIKE; OR

HOUSE BILL 1492 19
(3) LOCK OUT, SUSPEND, OR OTHERWISE WITHHOLD EMPLOYMENT
FROM PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEES IN ORDER TO INFLUENCE THE POSITION OF THE
PUBLIC LIBRARY EMPLOYEES OR AN EMPLOYEE ORGANIZATION PRECEDING A
STRIKE.
[(f)] (D) (1) The employer may not direct a lockout against employees.
(2) This subsection may not be construed to prohibit the employer from
exercising its managerial rights.
Article – State Government
22–103.
(A) THIS TITLE MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO INTERFERE WITH, DIMINISH,
OR LIMIT THE RIGHT TO STRIKE ESTABLISHED UNDER § 6–408, § 6–508, § 23–812,
OR § 23–913 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE.
(B) Decisions of the federal National Labor Relations Board may be afforded
persuasive weight in any interpretation of this title.
22–205.
(a) A public employer is prohibited from engaging in a lockout.
(b) [Public] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 6–408, § 6–508, § 23–812, OR §
23–913 OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE, PUBLIC employees are prohibited from engaging
in a strike.
(c) A public employer or an employee organization may not interfere with,
intimidate, restrain, coerce, or discriminate against a public employee because the public
employee exercises rights granted under this title.
22–206.
(b) Employee organizations and their agents or representatives are prohibited
from engaging in any unfair labor practice, including:
(1) interfering with, restraining, or coercing employees in the exercise of
their rights under this title;
(2) causing or attempting to cause a public employer to discriminate in
hiring, tenure, or any term or condition of employment to encourage or discourage
membership in an employee organization;

HOUSE BILL 1492
(3) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 6–408, § 6–508, § 23–812, OR § 23–913
OF THE EDUCATION ARTICLE, engaging in, inducing, or encouraging any person to
engage in a strike;
(4) interfering with the statutory duties of the State or a public employer;
(5) refusing to bargain in good faith; or
(6) not fairly representing employees in collective bargaining or in any
other matter in which the employee organization has the duty of fair representation.
22–406.
(a) [Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, the] THE Board shall
certify as exclusive representative the employee organization receiving the votes in an
election from a majority of the employees voting in the election.
(b) [After notice and an opportunity for a hearing, the Board may deny or revoke
certification as exclusive representative of an employee organization for willful failure to
comply with this title.
(c)] Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, the Board shall certify
the employee organization as the exclusive representative without an election if:
(1) a petition for an exclusive representative has been filed for a bargaining
unit;
(2) the Board finds that a majority of the employees in the bargaining unit
have signed valid authorizations designating the employee organization as their exclusive
representative; and
(3) no other employee organization is currently certified or recognized as
the exclusive representative of the bargaining unit.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.